Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1310.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "aggregate contribution" in section 1902-K of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.674, No.56), is amended to read:Section 1902-K. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aggregate contribution." [The]1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (1) For taxable years ending before January 1, 2026, the aggregate contribution that a qualified taxpayer makes to all employees during the taxable year for which the qualified taxpayer seeks the employer child care contribution tax credit established under this article, provided that only the first $500 in contributions per employee shall count toward the aggregate contribution.(2) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and for each taxable year thereafter, the aggregate contribution that a qualified taxpayer makes to all employees during the taxable year for which the qualified taxpayer seeks the employer child care contribution tax credit established under this article, provided that only the first $10,000 in contributions per employee shall count toward the aggregate contribution.* * *Section 2. Section 1903-K(c) of the act, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.674, No.56), is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1903-K. Employer child care contribution tax credit.* * *(c) Amount of tax credit.--[The](1) For taxable years ending before January 1, 2026, the amount of the tax credit under subsection (a) shall be equal to 30% of the aggregate contribution made to employees during the tax year.(2) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, the amount of the tax credit under subsection (a) shall be equal to 100% of the aggregate contribution made to employees during the tax year.20260SB1310PN1666 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Cap.--In no case shall the aggregate amount of tax credits awarded in any fiscal year under this article exceed $10,000,000.(e) Proration.--If the total amount of otherwise approvable tax credits applied for by all qualified taxpayers exceeds the amount under subsection (d), the tax credit to be received by each qualified taxpayer shall be the product of the amount under subsection (d) multiplied by the quotient of the tax credits otherwise approvable for the qualified taxpayer divided by the total of all tax credits otherwise approvable for all qualified taxpayers.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1310PN1666 - 3 - 123456789101112